inc/flattened/excel2fst/VTI.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
@R.Prefix.NONE@ @P.Prefix.o@ +X +%0PlO +3SgObv @R.Prefix.ni@ +3PlObv @P.Prefix.ni@ +3SgProx %>%> @R.Prefix.o@ +Prt @P.Prefix.gi@ +1Sg %<%< +%0SgO +Dub +Excl +Ind +Incl +Neg +VTI @P.Prefix.NONE@ +3PlProx +Neu +%0SgO/%0PlO @R.Prefix.gi@ +2Sg +Pos +Cnj +2Pl

LEXICON Root
VTI_Prefix ;

LEXICON VTI_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ VTI_Prefix_WB ;
@P.Prefix.gi@:@P.Prefix.gi@gi VTI_Prefix_WB ;
@P.Prefix.ni@:@P.Prefix.ni@ni VTI_Prefix_WB ;
@P.Prefix.o@:@P.Prefix.o@o VTI_Prefix_WB ;

LEXICON VTI_Prefix_WB
0:%<%< VTI_Stems ;

LEXICON VTI_Stems
ayaan VTI_aa_Subclass ;
miijin:miij VTI_i_Subclass ;
miijin VTI_in_Subclass ;
miijin VTI_i_Subclass ;
waabandam VTI_am_Subclass ;
waabandam:wabandam VTI_am_Subclass ;
wanitoon:wanit VTI_oo_Subclass ;
wanitoon VTI_oon_Subclass ;
wanitoon VTI_oo_Subclass ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                               !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VTI, Stem Type = aa   !!
!!                                               !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_aa_Subclass
+VTI:0 VTI_aa_Flags ;

LEXICON VTI_aa_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTI_aa_NONE_WB ;
@R.Prefix.gi@ VTI_aa_gi_WB ;
@R.Prefix.ni@ VTI_aa_ni_WB ;
@R.Prefix.o@ VTI_aa_o_WB ;

LEXICON VTI_aa_o_WB
0:%>%> VTI_aa_o_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_aa_o_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0PlO:siinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO:siinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0PlO:siininaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO:siininaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0PlO:siinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:siinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:siinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0PlO:siinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:siinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:siinaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:siinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:siininaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:siininaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO:siininaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:siinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:siinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+%0SgO:ninaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0PlO:naawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO:naawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0PlO:ninaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO:ninaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0PlO:naadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:naawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:naawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0PlO:nan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO:n # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:naawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:naawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:naawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:naabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:naabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:naaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_aa_gi_WB
0:%>%> VTI_aa_gi_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_aa_gi_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0PlO:siinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO:siinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0PlO:siinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0PlO:siiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0SgO:siiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0PlO:siinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO:siinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0PlO:siinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0SgO:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:siinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:siinaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO:siinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:siinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:siinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:siiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:siiminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0SgO:siiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0PlO:naawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO:naawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0PlO:naadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0PlO:minaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0SgO:minaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0PlO:naawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO:naawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0PlO:nan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO:n # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0SgO:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:naawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:naawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO:naawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:naabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:naabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO:naaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:minaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:minaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0SgO:minaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_aa_ni_WB
0:%>%> VTI_aa_ni_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_aa_ni_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0PlO:siinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0PlO:siiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0SgO:siiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0PlO:siinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0PlO:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0SgO:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:siinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:siinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:siiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:siiminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0SgO:siiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0PlO:naadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0PlO:minaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0SgO:minaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0PlO:nan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO:n # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0PlO:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0SgO:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:naabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:naabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO:naaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:minaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:minaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0SgO:minaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_aa_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VTI_aa_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_aa_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:nziwaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:nziweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:nziwan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:nzigwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:nzinig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:nzig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:nziwaang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:nziwang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:man # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:ng # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:maang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:minid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:mowaad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:mang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:meg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:nziigwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:nziinigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:nziigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:mogwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:minigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:mogoban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                               !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VTI, Stem Type = am   !!
!!                                               !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_am_Subclass
+VTI:0 VTI_am_Flags ;

LEXICON VTI_am_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTI_am_NONE_WB ;
@R.Prefix.gi@ VTI_am_gi_WB ;
@R.Prefix.ni@ VTI_am_ni_WB ;
@R.Prefix.o@ VTI_am_o_WB ;

LEXICON VTI_am_gi_WB
0:%>%> VTI_am_gi_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_am_gi_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0PlO:anziinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO:anziinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0PlO:anziinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO:anziinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0PlO:anziiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0SgO:anziiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0PlO:anziinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO:anziinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0PlO:anziinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO:anziin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:anziimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0SgO:anziimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:anziinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:anziinaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO:anziinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:anziinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:anziinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO:anziinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:anziiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:anziiminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0SgO:anziiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0PlO:aanaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO:aanaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0PlO:aanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO:aanaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0PlO:aaminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0SgO:aaminaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0PlO:aanaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO:aanaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0PlO:aanan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO:aan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:aamin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0SgO:aamin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:aanaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:aawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO:aanaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:aabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:aanaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO:aanaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:aaminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:aaminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0SgO:aaminaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_am_ni_WB
0:%>%> VTI_am_ni_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_am_ni_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0PlO:anziinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO:anziinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0PlO:anziiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0SgO:anziiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0PlO:anziinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO:anziin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0PlO:anziimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0SgO:anziimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:anziinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:anziinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO:anziinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:anziiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:anziiminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0SgO:anziiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0PlO:aanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO:aanaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0PlO:aaminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0SgO:aaminaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0PlO:aanan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO:aan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0PlO:aamin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0SgO:aamin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:aanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:aanaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO:aanaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:aaminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:aaminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0SgO:aaminaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_am_o_WB
0:%>%> VTI_am_o_Endings ;
